Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201860-156
Duplicate certificate of title; fees.

(1) For each duplicate certificate of title issued by a county for a
vehicle, the fee shall be fourteen dollars. Ten dollars shall be retained
by the county. Four dollars shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit
to the Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund.

(2) For each duplicate certificate of title issued by the department
for a vehicle, the fee shall be fourteen dollars. Four dollars shall be remitted to the State Treasurer
for credit to the Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund. Ten dollars shall be remitted
to the State Treasurer for credit to the Motor Carrier Division Cash Fund.

Laws 2005, LB 276, § 56;

Laws 2013, LB30, § 2.